West Virginia, session 2026, HB4921.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7B.  THE West Virginia Second Amendment Preservation and Anti-Federal Commandeering Act. §61-7B-4. Federal commandeering prohibited; illegal attempt by agents or employees of the federal government to enforce certain acts; misdemeanor; penalty; enforcement by attorney general. (a) No agency of this state, political subdivision of this state, or employee of an agency, or political subdivision of this state, acting in his or her official capacity, may be commandeered by the United States government under an executive order or action of the President of the United States or under an act of the Congress of the United States. Federal commandeering of West Virginia law-enforcement for purposes of enforcement of federal firearms laws is prohibited.(b) Any federal official, agent, or other employee who attempts to enforce any decree or writ in this state that has not specifically passed by congress or issued by other due process of law is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $500 or confined in jail not more than one year and a day, or both fined and confined. The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this subsection.